District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Removing Barriers and Reducing Stigma to Encourage HIV Prevention
Amendment Act of 2025”.

Sec. 2. The Prohibition of Discrimination in the Provision of Insurance Act of 1986,
effective August 7, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-132; D.C. Official Code § 31-1601 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 31-1601) is amended by adding a new paragraph (8)
to read as follows:
“(8) “Pre-exposure Prophylaxis” includes daily oral antiretroviral medication,
which has either a fixed-dose combination of tenofovir disoproxil fumarate and emtricitabine or
a fixed-dose combination of tenofovir alafenamide and emtricitabine, and extended-release
injectable suspension antiretroviral medication with active ingredient cabotegravir.
(b) A new section 12 (D.C. Official Code § 31-1611) is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 12. Prohibition against discrimination in use of pre-exposure prophylaxis.
“(a) No life, disability income, or long-term care insurance policy or contract shall
contain any exclusion, reduction, or other limitation of benefits related to the use of pre-exposure
prophylaxis when taken pursuant to a valid prescriber’s order.
“(b) In reviewing an application for life, disability income, or long-term care
insurance, no insurer, or an agent, broker, or employee of the insurer shall factor the use of pre-
exposure prophylaxis when taken pursuant to a valid prescriber’s order into a decision regarding:
“(1) whether to issue, renew, or cancel a policy;
“(2) the rates, premiums, dues, assessments, benefits covered, or expenses
reimbursable under the policy; or
“(3) The duration or terms of the policy.


“(c) In addition to the applicable penalties of section 9 of this chapter, an insurer,
or an agent, broker, or employee of the insurer shall be fined not less than $1,000, and not more
than $10,000 for each violation of this section.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.